Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.012, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Certain wheelchair accessible vehicles. new text end new text begin A wheelchair accessible vehicle that is an autonomous vehicle operated as part of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, as that term is defined in section 169B.01, subdivision 11, is not subject to registration taxes under this chapter. "Wheelchair accessible vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is equipped to allow a person to enter and exit, independently or with assistance, while seated in a wheelchair. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [169B.01] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Terms. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given and terms defined in section 169.011 have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized operator. new text end new text begin "Authorized operator" means the person authorized by the commissioner under section 169B.03 to operate an autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state with the automated driving system engaged. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Automated driving system. new text end new text begin "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether the dynamic driving task is limited to a specific operational design domain. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Autonomous vehicle. new text end new text begin "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level 4 or 5 system under SAE J3016. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commercial autonomous vehicle operations. new text end new text begin "Commercial autonomous vehicle operations" means the use of an autonomous vehicle for commercial purposes, including but not limited to transporting passengers or goods. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin (a) "Dynamic driving task" means the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) lateral vehicle motion control via steering; new text end new text begin (2) longitudinal motion control via acceleration and deceleration; new text end new text begin (3) monitoring the driving environment via object and event detection, recognition, classification, and response preparation; new text end new text begin (4) object and event response execution; new text end new text begin (5) maneuver planning; and new text end new text begin (6) enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and gesturing. new text end new text begin (b) Dynamic driving task does not include strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Dynamic driving task fallback. new text end new text begin "Dynamic driving task fallback" means: new text end new text begin (1) the response by the person or human driver to either perform the dynamic driving task or achieve a minimal risk condition after occurrence of a dynamic driving task performance-relevant system failure or upon operational design domain exit; and new text end new text begin (2) the response by an automated driving system to achieve minimal risk condition, given the same circumstances. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin First responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin "First responder interaction plan" means a document of procedures specifying the capabilities that an autonomous vehicle must have to ensure that a first responder can safely interact with an autonomous vehicle. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Human driver. new text end new text begin "Human driver" means a natural person in a vehicle with a valid license to operate a motor vehicle who controls all or part of the dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Minimal risk condition. new text end new text begin "Minimal risk condition" means a condition to which a person, human driver, or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle after performing the dynamic driving task fallback in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin On-demand autonomous vehicle network. new text end new text begin "On-demand autonomous vehicle network" means a transportation service network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or otherwise enable the prearrangement of transportation with autonomous vehicles for purposes of transporting passengers or goods, including for-hire transportation and transportation of passengers or goods for compensation. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Operational design domain. new text end new text begin "Operational design domain" means operating conditions under which an automated driving system is specifically designed to function, including but not limited to environmental, geographical, and time-of-day restrictions and the requisite presence or absence of certain traffic or roadway characteristics. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Request to intervene. new text end new text begin "Request to intervene" means a notification by an automated driving system to a human driver that the human driver should promptly begin or resume performance of part or all of the dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin SAE J3016. new text end new text begin "SAE J3016" means the April 2021 revision of the Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles published by SAE International. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Teleoperation. new text end new text begin "Teleoperation" means a natural person using a communication system to remotely perform part or all of the dynamic driving task of a motor vehicle. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [169B.02] AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Operating requirements; authorization required. new text end new text begin A person must not operate an autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state with the automated driving system engaged unless the vehicle meets the requirements of this chapter and receives authorization from the commissioner of public safety under section 169B.03. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Automated driving system failure. new text end new text begin If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders the system unable to perform all or part of the dynamic driving task relevant to the system's intended operational design domain: new text end new text begin (1) an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must achieve a minimal risk condition; or new text end new text begin (2) an autonomous vehicle with a human driver must issue a request to intervene and, if the human driver does not respond in a reasonable amount of time, the autonomous vehicle must achieve a minimal risk condition. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Compliance with traffic laws. new text end new text begin (a) The autonomous vehicle must operate in compliance with all applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state at all times. new text end new text begin (b) An automated driving system must not have any functionality that operates the vehicle in a way that violates traffic laws. new text end new text begin (c) The authorized operator is responsible at all times for ensuring that the automated driving system is in full working order, including by ensuring that all sensors are operational and free of physical interference. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Federal requirements. new text end new text begin When required by federal law, an autonomous vehicle must bear the required manufacturer certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture the autonomous vehicle was certified as in compliance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, including reference to any exemption granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [169B.03] AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE PERMIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application process and requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A person seeking to operate an autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state must submit a complete and accurate application to the commissioner of public safety that contains the information required in subdivisions 3 to 7. An authorized operator must reapply for a permit on the first and second year anniversaries of first receiving a permit under this section and must renew the permit every four years thereafter. For purposes of this section, "applicant" means the person seeking a permit under this section. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must not issue an authorization under this section until the study required by section 169B.05, subdivision 6, is completed. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of public safety must ensure that the applicant, the autonomous vehicle, and the automated driving system under consideration comply with the requirements of this chapter prior to approving an application under this section. new text end new text begin (d) An authorized operator must provide the commissioner of public safety with an update to the information required in an application under this section no later than ..... days after the information materially changes. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin Upon initial approval of an application under this section, and each annual renewal of a permit, an applicant must pay a fee of $....... per autonomous vehicle operated under the permit. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Applicant information. new text end new text begin An applicant must provide the commissioner of public safety with the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the name, address, and principal point of contact for the applicant; new text end new text begin (2) for each autonomous vehicle that will be operated under the permit: new text end new text begin (i) proof of registration in compliance with chapters 168 and 168A; new text end new text begin (ii) the make, year, vehicle identification number, and license plate number; new text end new text begin (iii) the operational design domain; and new text end new text begin (iv) whether the vehicle will be operated without a human driver; and new text end new text begin (3) a written statement certifying that each autonomous vehicle in clause (2) complies with section 169B.02, subdivisions 2 to 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Financial responsibility. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant must provide proof of financial responsibility that satisfies the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) The owner of an autonomous vehicle must maintain proof of financial responsibility in the same form and at the same minimum limits required for a motor vehicle under sections 65B.48 and 65B.49. new text end new text begin (c) In addition to the requirements under paragraph (b), an applicant seeking authorization to operate an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must maintain proof of financial responsibility for the autonomous vehicle in an amount not less than $10,000,000 combined single limit per occurrence for third-party liability. new text end new text begin (d) Financial responsibility under paragraph (c) may be satisfied by: new text end new text begin (1) an insurance policy issued by an insurer licensed in this state; or new text end new text begin (2) a policy issued by an eligible surplus lines insurer pursuant to sections 60A.195 to 60A.2095. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin First responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant seeking authorization to operate an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must provide the commissioner of public safety with a first responder interaction plan that complies with the requirements issued by the commissioner of public safety under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) By December 31, 2026, the commissioner of public safety must issue guidance on minimum content and operational requirements for a first responder interaction plan. A first responder interaction plan must contain, at minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the capabilities that autonomous vehicles must have to ensure safe interactions with first responders in this state; new text end new text begin (2) safety and maintenance operations that the applicant will maintain to support the autonomous vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) how a first responder may communicate with a natural person who is able to remotely assist the first responder with the autonomous vehicle; new text end new text begin (4) how a first responder may safely remove the autonomous vehicle from the roadway and steps to safely tow the vehicle; new text end new text begin (5) how a first responder or other person may recognize whether the autonomous vehicle is in autonomous mode; and new text end new text begin (6) any additional information the commissioner of public safety, the manufacturer of the autonomous vehicle, or the manufacturer of the automated driving system deems necessary regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of the autonomous vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) The applicant may submit the first responder interaction plan prior to submitting an application under subdivision 1. The commissioner of public safety may request changes to the first responder interaction plan prior to receiving the full application. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Independent safety verification. new text end new text begin (a) An applicant seeking authorization to operate an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must provide the commissioner of public safety with evidence that the automated driving system is able to perform the entire dynamic driving task in the proposed operational design domain in conditions similar to those found in both urban and nonurban settings in this state, including but not limited to snowpack, ice, low visibility, black ice, and road salt. new text end new text begin (b) The evidence required under paragraph (a) must include demonstrated on-street operation in similar conditions and must be verified by an independent third party at the applicant's expense. The evidence must demonstrate that the autonomous vehicle interacts safely with all road users, including pedestrians and bicyclists, in the entire operational design domain. Verification under this paragraph may be used for multiple autonomous vehicles that use identical automated driving systems. new text end new text begin (c) If the automated driving system does not have sufficient on-street experience as required under paragraph (b), the commissioner of public safety may require that the applicant meet certain conditions prior to granting authorization to operate the autonomous vehicle without a human driver, including additional training time in relevant conditions with a human driver monitoring the automated driving system. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Signature required. new text end new text begin An application under this section must be signed by a corporate officer, general partner, limited liability company board member, or sole proprietor. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Permit scope and limitations; vehicle classes not eligible. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety may issue a permit to an applicant who meets the requirements of this section, except the commissioner must not issue a permit if: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant had a permit revoked during the preceding 180 days; new text end new text begin (2) the application for a permit contains a statement that is false, misleading, or fraudulent; or new text end new text begin (3) the applicant fails to provide all the required or requested information. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must include the following information in a permit issued under this section: new text end new text begin (1) whether each autonomous vehicle may be operated without a human driver; new text end new text begin (2) the approved operational design domain; new text end new text begin (3) any restrictions on operational design domain, such as area, season, or time-of-day; and new text end new text begin (4) any other information or restrictions the commissioner determines necessary. new text end new text begin (c) A person must not operate an autonomous vehicle in a way that is inconsistent with the permit issued under this section. new text end new text begin (d) Only a passenger vehicle is eligible for authorization under this section. A person must not operate an autonomous vehicle of any other class on the public roads of this state. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Inspection and investigation authority. new text end new text begin Upon receipt of a complaint or other information alleging a violation of this chapter, the commissioner of public safety may investigate the relevant matter. Representatives of the Departments of Transportation and Public Safety have authority to inspect the records of an authorized operator, including video data, for purposes of complaint investigations, safety reviews, audits, or accident investigations. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety may suspend, revoke, or rescind the authority to operate an autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state if the commissioner of public safety determines that the continued operation of the autonomous vehicle constitutes a threat to public safety. Reasons for the determination include but are not limited to findings by the commissioner of public safety that the autonomous driving system: new text end new text begin (1) caused a collision involving the autonomous vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) violated state or local traffic laws or regulations; or new text end new text begin (3) made a dangerous driving decision that no reasonable human driver would make. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must suspend, revoke, or rescind the authority to operate an autonomous vehicle on the public roads of this state if the commissioner of public safety determines that the automated driving system is found by a court of law to have: new text end new text begin (1) committed an offense described in section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (7), (8), (9), or (11); or new text end new text begin (2) caused a collision that resulted in substantial bodily harm or death. new text end new text begin (c) Prior to reinstating authorization, the commissioner of public safety must determine that the automated driving system's capabilities improved sufficiently to prevent a future collision or violation in circumstances similar to those that led to the suspension under paragraph (a) or (b). new text end new text begin (d) In making any determination under paragraph (a), (b), or (c), the commissioner of public safety may request further information from the authorized operator and may consider the authorized operator's cooperation in determining whether to suspend or reinstate authorization under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Rules. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 14 governing the authorization required under this section and as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state declared in this section. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [169B.04] AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE DRIVER; LICENSURE; COLLISIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition of driver; licensure; citations. new text end new text begin (a) When no human driver is present, the automated driving system is considered a driver of the autonomous vehicle for the purpose of assessing compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws and is deemed to electronically satisfy all physical acts required by a driver. new text end new text begin (b) A natural person operating an autonomous vehicle remotely does not satisfy the physical acts required by a driver of a vehicle. Teleoperation is not permitted on the public roads of this state except as expressly approved as part of a first responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (c) An automated driving system is considered to be licensed to operate an autonomous vehicle under chapter 171 if the autonomous vehicle has been authorized to operate without a human driver under section 169B.03. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin (a) The authorized operator of an autonomous vehicle is legally and financially responsible for any violation of traffic or motor vehicle laws committed by the automated driving system acting as a driver under subdivision 1, paragraph (a). Any citation issued to the automated driving system as a driver must instead be issued to the authorized operator. new text end new text begin (b) For the purpose of calculating the number of violations of a law or rule, an automated driving system that is authorized to operate multiple autonomous vehicles in this state is considered a single driver and responsible for every violation by a vehicle operating under the same authorization regardless of which autonomous vehicle violates the law or rule. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Liability. new text end new text begin (a) For the purpose of determining fault and liability in the event of a collision involving an autonomous vehicle without a human driver, the automated driving system is considered to be the driver, and the automated driving system's actions must be assessed using the higher of: new text end new text begin (1) the standard that would be applied to a natural person controlling the entire dynamic driving task in a motor vehicle in a similar circumstance; or new text end new text begin (2) the industry standard for the SAE automation level and the operational design domain that the commissioner of public safety has authorized for the automated driving system involved in the collision. new text end new text begin (b) In any collision involving an autonomous vehicle with the automated driving system engaged, the following parties are jointly and severally liable for any liability incurred by the autonomous vehicle or the autonomous driving system acting as a driver: new text end new text begin (1) the authorized operator of the autonomous vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) the manufacturer of the autonomous vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) the manufacturer of the automated driving system; and new text end new text begin (4) if the autonomous vehicle is part of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, the network. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Collisions involving autonomous vehicles. new text end new text begin (a) A human driver of an autonomous vehicle involved in a collision must comply with the requirements of section 169.09. new text end new text begin (b) In the event of a collision, an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must immediately stop at the scene of the collision consistent with the requirements of section 169.09 and must remain on the scene until: new text end new text begin (1) released by the authorized operator consistent with paragraph (c); or new text end new text begin (2) as otherwise required by a first responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (c) In the event of a collision, the authorized operator of an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must comply, to the extent possible, with the requirements of section 169.09 that apply to a human driver. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) An authorized operator must report the following incidents to the commissioner of public safety within 24 hours: new text end new text begin (1) any collision involving the autonomous vehicle resulting in injury, death, or property damage; and new text end new text begin (2) any instance where the automated driving system of the autonomous vehicle has been issued a citation or other penalty for violating traffic laws or regulations. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the reports required under paragraph (a), an authorized operator must provide reports to the commissioner of public safety at the end of each calendar quarter with summary data that includes all of the following incidents involving an autonomous vehicle: new text end new text begin (1) an accident; new text end new text begin (2) a near miss; new text end new text begin (3) an intervention in the dynamic driving task by a remote natural human operator; new text end new text begin (4) a disengagement; new text end new text begin (5) any instance where the autonomous driving system determines that it has violated a traffic law or regulation, whether or not it was issued a citation; new text end new text begin (6) anonymized travel data, including vehicle miles traveled and trip origin and destination data; new text end new text begin (7) a mapping error; and new text end new text begin (8) a passenger or pedestrian safety incident. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of public safety must maintain a public website that provides summary data of incidents reported under paragraphs (a) and (b) for each autonomous vehicle. The commissioner of public safety must update the public website within five business days of receiving data under paragraph (a) or (b). new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [169B.05] COMMERCIAL AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE OPERATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Operation limitations. new text end new text begin Commercial autonomous vehicle operations, including the operation of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, are prohibited in this state until the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force delivers its required report and the commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit process has been established by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision 2. No entity may begin commercial autonomous vehicle operations without a permit issued by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Permit process. new text end new text begin The commissioner may develop a commercial autonomous vehicle operations permit process based on the study and recommendations provided by the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force. The commissioner must ensure that any permit process for an on-demand autonomous vehicle network conforms to the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin On-demand autonomous vehicle network authorization. new text end new text begin (a) A person must obtain a permit from the commissioner under this section to operate an on-demand autonomous vehicle network to transport passengers or goods in this state. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may issue a permit to an on-demand autonomous vehicle network to transport passengers or goods in this state, including for hire, upon application and confirmation by the commissioner that the on-demand autonomous vehicle network satisfies the requirements of this section and any additional requirements adopted by the commissioner under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or rescind the permit issued under paragraph (b) if the commissioner determines that the on-demand autonomous vehicle network is no longer in compliance with one or more requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Authorized autonomous vehicles. new text end new text begin (a) A person seeking a permit to operate an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must maintain with the commissioner at all times a current list of the autonomous vehicles operating on the network and provide proof to the commissioner that each vehicle is authorized by the commissioner of public safety under section 169B.03. new text end new text begin (b) The operator of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must ensure that every autonomous vehicle in the network complies with the requirements under this chapter at all times and must immediately remove a vehicle from service if the vehicle ceases to comply with this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) The operator of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must promptly report to the commissioner any changes to the information provided under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Operating requirements. new text end new text begin (a) An autonomous vehicle operating on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must not accept requests for service via traditional street hail. new text end new text begin (b) Every autonomous vehicle operating in an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must be an all-electric vehicle. new text end new text begin (c) Autonomous vehicles operating in an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must avoid using transit corridors when driving without passengers, except when responding to a pickup request on the transit corridor and must not interfere with transit vehicles when driving with passengers. new text end new text begin (d) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must disclose to the rider the fare or fare calculator method on its website or within the online-enabled technology application service before the beginning of a prearranged ride. new text end new text begin (e) Upon completion of a ride, an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must transmit an electronic receipt to the rider that lists: new text end new text begin (1) the origin and destination of the ride; new text end new text begin (2) the total time and distance of the ride; and new text end new text begin (3) the total fare paid. new text end new text begin (f) At all times while an autonomous vehicle is active on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, the vehicle must display a consistent and distinctive signage or emblem. Acceptable forms of distinctive signage include but are not limited to symbols or signs on vehicle doors, roofs, or grilles, including magnetic or other removable signs or symbols. new text end new text begin (g) Prior to being put into service on any on-demand autonomous vehicle network and annually thereafter, an autonomous vehicle must be inspected to confirm the vehicle is in good working condition. The on-demand autonomous vehicle network must maintain documentation of inspections for a period of three years. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Traffic study. new text end new text begin Prior to authorizing an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, the commissioner must require a traffic study of the area where the network will operate. The cost of the study must be paid by the person seeking authorization to operate an on-demand autonomous vehicle network. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Local considerations. new text end new text begin Prior to granting a permit to a proposed on-demand autonomous vehicle network under this section, the commissioner must permit a municipality within the proposed area of operation to review and provide comments on the traffic study required under subdivision 6. The commissioner must consider any requests from the municipality regarding the operation of the proposed network. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Equity; accessibility; transit. new text end new text begin (a) A person seeking a permit to operate an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must present a plan to the commissioner to address issues of accessibility and equity, including how the network meets the requirements under this subdivision. The commissioner may impose additional requirements to address issues of accessibility and equity based upon the recommendations of the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force. new text end new text begin (b) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must serve neighborhoods outside of high-profit corridors. new text end new text begin (c) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must provide a plan to operate in conjunction with existing public transit networks. new text end new text begin (d) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must not discriminate between serving residential neighborhoods based on the racial, ethnic, or economic status of the residents. new text end new text begin (e) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must serve residents who do not have smartphones. new text end new text begin (f) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must provide vehicles that are accessible to passengers with disabilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Accessibility. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the Governor's Council on Connected and Automated Vehicles and the Minnesota Council on Disability, must develop guidance or recommendations regarding accessibility standards, including digital accessibility standards, for automated vehicles and automated vehicle services to ensure accessible and usable transportation options for individuals with disabilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Accessible vehicles required. new text end new text begin An on-demand autonomous vehicle network with between 40 and 60 autonomous vehicles operating in the network must operate at least two wheelchair accessible vehicles at all times. An on-demand autonomous vehicle network with over 60 autonomous vehicles operating in the network must maintain a total number of wheelchair accessible vehicles that constitutes at least ten percent of vehicles in the network at all times. If an on-demand autonomous vehicle network cannot provide a wheelchair accessible vehicle, the network must direct the request to a provider of wheelchair accessible vehicles. For the purpose of this subdivision, "wheelchair accessible vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is equipped to allow a person to enter and exit, independently or with assistance, while seated in a wheelchair. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Wheelchair accessible vehicles. new text end new text begin At all times that an on-demand autonomous vehicle network operates wheelchair accessible vehicles, as that term is defined in section 168.012, subdivision 14, that constitute more than ten percent of the total number of autonomous vehicles operating in the network, the registration taxes owed under section 168.013 on each autonomous vehicle in the network that is not a wheelchair accessible vehicle is reduced by 50 percent. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Emergency protocol; passenger assistance. new text end new text begin (a) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must equip each autonomous vehicle operating in the network with a system that is able to connect directly with emergency service providers in the event of a passenger emergency. The on-demand autonomous vehicle network must have in place a protocol that provides for when and how emergency service providers are contacted and must include the protocol in the first responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (b) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must have a system to provide nonemergency physical assistance to a passenger in need of assistance at the beginning, during, or at the end of a prearranged ride. The on-demand autonomous vehicle network must disclose the availability of the service and provide instructions for obtaining assistance within the online-enabled technology application used to arrange a ride and in each autonomous vehicle operating in the network. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Modifications. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must consider the following factors when determining whether to grant a permit under this section: new text end new text begin (1) the proposed on-demand autonomous vehicle network's compliance with the requirements under this section; new text end new text begin (2) any recommendations provided by the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force; new text end new text begin (3) input provided by a local government within the proposed service area; new text end new text begin (4) impact on traffic conditions; new text end new text begin (5) impact on public transit; new text end new text begin (6) impact on paratransit; and new text end new text begin (7) public safety. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may request modifications to the proposed service to address the considerations in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Mandatory suspension. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must suspend the permit of an on-demand vehicle network for a minimum of six months if the authorized operator or the automated driving system of an autonomous vehicle in the network is found by a court of law to have: new text end new text begin (1) committed a criminal violation of traffic laws or regulations; or new text end new text begin (2) caused a collision that resulted in injury or death. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not reinstate a permit suspended under paragraph (a) until the commissioner receives verification from an independent third party that the capabilities of the automated driving system have sufficiently improved to prevent an incident similar to the incident that required suspension under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) If the permit of an autonomous vehicle operating on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network is suspended, revoked, or rescinded by the commissioner of public safety under this subdivision, the commissioner must immediately suspend the permit of the on-demand autonomous vehicle network until the commissioner of public safety reauthorizes the autonomous vehicle. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Labor impact. new text end new text begin Based on the recommendations of the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force, the commissioner may impose additional requirements upon the operator of an on-demand autonomous network to ameliorate any negative workforce impacts, including by imposing fees. The money collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the workforce development fund to be used for the dislocated worker program under section 116L.17. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Infrastructure costs. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision applies when: new text end new text begin (1) a political subdivision determines that the political subdivision must provide additional infrastructure to accommodate the planned operations of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner determines that the traffic study required under subdivision 6 supports the political subdivision's determination. new text end new text begin (b) When this subdivision applies, the commissioner may: new text end new text begin (1) require an on-demand autonomous vehicle network to pay for the infrastructure costs identified in paragraph (a), clause (1), as a condition of receiving a permit; or new text end new text begin (2) require modifications to the planned operations of the on-demand autonomous vehicle network to address any issue identified by the political subdivision under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Data privacy. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding section 325M.12, subdivision 1, an on-demand autonomous vehicle network is subject to the Minnesota Consumer Data Privacy Act under sections 325M.10 to 325M.21. new text end new text begin (b) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must not disclose personal data of any customer to law enforcement or in connection with a law enforcement investigation except as required by court order or a valid search warrant. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Local authority. new text end new text begin This section does not limit the authority of a county, statutory or home rule charter city, town, special district, or airport authority to regulate the operation of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network within its boundaries, including by requiring permits or imposing requirements and fees. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Rules. new text end new text begin The commissioner may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 14 governing the authorization and operation of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network under this section and as may be necessary to implement recommendations of the Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin ADVISORY TASK FORCE ESTABLISHED; COMMERCIAL AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE OPERATIONS IMPACT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; members. new text end new text begin (a) The Commercial Autonomous Vehicle Operations Impact Advisory Task Force is established to provide recommendations to the commissioner of transportation regarding the impact of commercial autonomous vehicle operations in Minnesota. The advisory task force is composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of transportation or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of public safety or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner of commerce or a designee; new text end new text begin (4) the attorney general or a designee; new text end new text begin (5) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (6) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house; new text end new text begin (7) one member of the senate appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (8) one member of the senate appointed by the senate minority leader; new text end new text begin (9) one representative from the driver workforce in the private sector appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (10) one representative from the driver workforce in the public sector appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (11) one rideshare driver appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (12) one representative from the disability rights community appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (13) one representative from a municipal government appointed by the League of Minnesota Cities; new text end new text begin (14) one representative from a city of the first class in the seven-county metropolitan area appointed by the League of Minnesota Cities; new text end new text begin (15) five representatives from the small business community, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives, one appointed by the senate majority leader, one appointed by the senate minority leader, and one appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (16) one representative appointed by the Motorcycle Industry Council; new text end new text begin (17) one representative appointed by the Metropolitan Airports Commission; new text end new text begin (18) one representative of organized labor appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (19) one representative from the Department of Transportation's Connected and Automated Vehicles Office appointed by the commissioner of transportation; new text end new text begin (20) one representative from a consumer rights advocacy group appointed by the governor; and new text end new text begin (21) two representatives, each from a different autonomous vehicle company, appointed by the governor. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioners or their designees appointed under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (3), must serve as cochairs of the advisory task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commercial autonomous vehicle operations study. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory task force must conduct a comprehensive review of commercial autonomous vehicle operations and evaluate its potential deployment in Minnesota. The advisory task force may enlist an independent research institution with expertise in rideshare labor economics to assist with the advisory task force's duties under this section. The review must include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) an independent economic impact study to determine the short- and long-term effects of commercial autonomous vehicle operations on rideshare drivers and commercial drivers and workforce displacement projections; new text end new text begin (2) economic impacts on transportation network company drivers; new text end new text begin (3) reemployment pathways for displaced rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (4) economic displacement impacts on businesses that serve rideshare drivers and commercial drivers; new text end new text begin (5) financial impacts on Minnesota, including those due to reduction in tax revenues; new text end new text begin (6) accessibility offerings and supports for people with disabilities; new text end new text begin (7) whether the state should impose fees to support programs to address negative impacts identified by the advisory task force; new text end new text begin (8) legal liability in the event of a collision; new text end new text begin (9) algorithmic management, including requiring public notification for any changes to the algorithm that could impact how autonomous vehicles interact with other vehicles or pedestrians; new text end new text begin (10) financial and infrastructure impacts on cities and the state; new text end new text begin (11) development of a certification process not overseen by the autonomous vehicle industry; new text end new text begin (12) potential for interference with first responders; new text end new text begin (13) an evaluation of autonomous vehicles' ability to navigate city streets; and new text end new text begin (14) an assessment of vehicle miles traveled and congestion impacts of commercial autonomous vehicle operations and whether a per-mile fee should be imposed on autonomous vehicles operating in an on-demand autonomous vehicle network. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory task force must hold public hearings subject to the Open Meeting Law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D, to obtain testimony from rideshare drivers, commercial drivers, and members of the public. The advisory task force must accept public comment for no fewer than 30 days after the release of any preliminary findings. new text end new text begin (c) By February 1, 2028, the advisory task force must submit the final report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance and the Legislative Reference Library. The commissioner must also publish a final report on the Department of Transportation's website. The report must include recommendations to the commissioner of transportation on whether commercial autonomous vehicle operations should be allowed to operate in Minnesota, whether a human driver should be required during commercial autonomous vehicle operations, and potential requirements for a permit process to authorize commercial autonomous vehicle operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration; terms of membership. new text end new text begin The commissioner must convene the first meeting of the advisory task force by September 30, 2026, and provide staff support to the advisory task force. The provisions of Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6, govern the terms and removal of members of the advisory task force. Members of the advisory task force serve without compensation or per diem. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The advisory task force expires on February 1, 2028. new text end